North Carolina statutes. Chapter 77. Rivers, Creeks, and Coastal Waters.
Article 8. River Basins Advisory Commissions.

§ 77-110.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Article:

“Commission” or “commissions” means (i) the Catawba/Wateree River Basin Advisory Commission, (ii) the Yadkin/Pee Dee River Basin Advisory Commission, or (iii) both commissions, as required by the context.

“River basin” or “river basins” means (i) that land area designated as the Catawba River Basin pursuant to

G.S. 143-215.22

G and that land area designated as the Catawba/Wateree River Basin by the South Carolina Department of Health and Environmental Control, (ii) that land area designated as the Yadkin (Yadkin-Pee Dee) River Basin pursuant to

G.S. 143-215.22

G and that land area designated as the Yadkin/Pee Dee River Basin by the South Carolina Department of Health and Environmental Control, or (iii) both river basins, as required by the context.

History.

2004-83, s. 1.

§ 77-111.
Commissions established; purposes.

There is established the Catawba/Wateree River Basin Advisory Commission and the Yadkin/Pee Dee River Basin Advisory Commission. The commissions shall be constituted as described in this Article and there shall be a separate commission for each river basin. The commissions shall be permanent bodies composed of members from the State of North Carolina and the State of South Carolina. The purpose of each commission shall be to:

Provide guidance and make recommendations to local, state, and federal legislative and administrative bodies, and to others as it considers necessary and appropriate, for the use, stewardship, and enhancement of the water, and other natural resources, for all citizens within the river basins.

Provide a forum for discussion of issues affecting the river basin’s water quantity and water quality, and issues affecting other natural resources.

Promote communication, coordination, and education among stakeholders within the river basins.

Identify problems and recommend appropriate solutions.

Undertake studies related to water quantity, water quality, and other natural resources in the river basin based on existing data available from agencies located in either state.

Determine the optimum approach to comprehensively and collaboratively provide recommendations for integrated river management including, but not limited to, the total assimilative capacity of the river basin.

History.

2004-83, s. 1.

§ 77-112.
Powers and duties.

The authority granted to each commission shall be advisory in nature and in no way shall either commission be construed to have any regulatory authority.

Neither commission shall have any authority to obligate or otherwise bind the State of North Carolina, the State of South Carolina, or any agency or subdivision of either state.

To achieve its purposes, each commission shall have all of the following powers and duties:

To develop rules and procedures for the conduct of its business or as may be necessary to perform its duties and carry out its objectives including, but not limited to, calling meetings and establishing voting procedures. Rules and procedures developed pursuant to this item shall be effective upon an affirmative vote by a majority of the commission members.

To establish standing and ad hoc committees, which shall be constituted in a manner to ensure a balance between recognized interests and states. The commissions shall determine the purpose of each standing or ad hoc committee.

To seek, apply for, accept, and expend gifts, grants, donations, services, and other aid from public or private sources. The commissions may accept or expend funds only after an affirmative vote by a majority of the members of the commissions.

To exercise the powers of a body corporate, including the power to sue and be sued, and adopt and use a common seal and alter the same.

To enter into contracts and execute all instruments necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of the commissions.

To designate a fiscal agent.

To perform any lawful acts necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of the commissions.

History.

2004-83, s. 1.

§ 77-113.
Membership; terms of office; eligibility for appointment; meetings.

The Catawba/Wateree River Basin Advisory Commission shall be composed of 15 members as follows:

Two members of the North Carolina House of Representatives whose districts include a part of the North Carolina portion of the river basin, to be appointed by the Speaker of the North Carolina House of Representatives.

Two members of the North Carolina Senate whose districts include a part of the North Carolina portion of the river basin, to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the North Carolina Senate.

Two members of the South Carolina House of Representatives, to be appointed by the Speaker of the South Carolina House of Representatives.

Two members of the South Carolina Senate, to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the South Carolina Senate.

One person from South Carolina representing a water or sewer municipal utility to be appointed by the South Carolina legislative members of the Commission.

One person from a nonprofit land conservation trust operating within the North Carolina portion of the river basin, appointed by the Governor of North Carolina.

The President of Duke Power or the President’s designee.

The Chair of the Bi-State Catawba River Task Force or the Chair’s designee.

The Chief Executive Officer of Carolina’s Partnership, Inc., or the Chief Executive Officer’s designee.

One person to represent the following commissions, appointed jointly by the three chief executive officers of the commissions: the Lake Wylie Marine Commission established pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 77 of the General Statutes, the Mountain Island Lake Marine Commission established pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 77 of the General Statutes, and the Lake Norman Marine Commission established pursuant to Chapter 1089 of the 1969 Session Laws.

One member of a lake homeowner’s association located on the Catawba/Wateree River whose members reside in South Carolina, to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the South Carolina Senate.

The Yadkin/Pee Dee River Basin Advisory Commission shall be composed of 15 members as follows:

Two members of the North Carolina House of Representatives whose districts include a part of the North Carolina portion of the river basin, to be appointed by the Speaker of the North Carolina House of Representatives.

Two members of the North Carolina Senate whose districts include a part of the North Carolina portion of the river basin, to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the North Carolina Senate.

Two members of the South Carolina House of Representatives, to be appointed by the Speaker of the South Carolina House of Representatives.

Two members of the South Carolina Senate, to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the South Carolina Senate.

One person from South Carolina representing a water or sewer municipal utility to be appointed by the South Carolina legislative members of the Commission.

One person from South Carolina representing the agricultural community to be appointed by the South Carolina legislative members of the Commission.

One person from a water or sewer municipal utility, appointed by the Governor of North Carolina.

The President of Progress Energy or the President’s designee.

The President of Alcoa Power Generating, Inc., (APGI) or the President’s designee.

The President of Weyerhaeuser or the President’s designee.

A representative of the land development industry, whose organization does business within the Yadkin/Pee Dee River Basin and who shall be appointed by the Chair of the Commission.

Each member appointed to the commissions pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority so long as the member remains a Representative or Senator. Each member appointed to the commissions pursuant to subdivisions (3) and (4) of subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall serve as provided by the General Assembly of South Carolina. Each member appointed to the commissions pursuant to subdivisions (7) through (9) of subsection (a) and subdivisions (8) through (10) of subsection (b) of this section shall serve for so long as the member continues in the qualifying position or, if the member is a designee, at the pleasure of the designating authority. Each member appointed to the commissions pursuant to subdivisions (6) and (10) of subsection (a) and subdivisions (7) and (11) of subsection (b) of this section shall serve a term of two years and may be reappointed to serve no more than three consecutive full terms or 84 consecutive months, whichever is greater. The term of a person appointed to the commission pursuant to subdivision (10) of subsection (a) of this section shall expire on 1 January of even-numbered years. The term of a person appointed to the commission pursuant to subdivision (6) of subsection (a) of this section shall expire on 1 January of odd-numbered years. The term of a member who is appointed to the commissions pursuant to subdivisions (5) and (11) of subsection (a) and subdivisions (5) and (6) of subsection (b) of this section shall serve as provided by the General Assembly of South Carolina. An appointment to fill a vacancy on the commissions shall be for the unexpired portion of the term. A vacancy on the commissions shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. Members of the commissions who are appointed from or reside in North Carolina may be removed by the Governor of North Carolina for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance, as provided in G.S. 143B-13.

The legislative members of each commission may appoint additional members to the commission to serve as advisory members as the legislative members consider necessary.

The members of each commission shall elect a Chair, Vice-Chair, and any other officers they consider necessary and shall determine the length of the term of office, not to exceed two years, of each officer. The Chair and the Vice-Chair shall not be from the same state and the Chair shall be rotated between the State of North Carolina and the State of South Carolina.

Each commission shall meet upon the call of the Chair. A majority of each commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The legislative members of the commissions from each state may meet separately to discuss river basin-related issues affecting their state and may report their findings independently of the commissions.

History.

2004-83, s. 1; 2005-37, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-37, s. 1, effective May 12, 2005, substituted “utility” for “authority” in subdivision (b)(7).

§ 77-114.
Staffing; meeting facilities; assistance by agencies.

The North Carolina Department of Environmental Quality and the South Carolina Department of Health and Environmental Control shall provide staff support and facilities to each commission within the existing programs of the respective agencies. Additional staff may be hired or contracted by each commission through funds raised by or provided to it. The duties and compensation of any additional staff shall be determined and fixed by each commission, within available resources.

All agencies of the State of North Carolina and the State of South Carolina shall cooperate with the commissions and, upon request, shall assist each commission in fulfilling its responsibilities. The North Carolina Secretary of Environmental Quality and the Commissioner of the South Carolina Department of Health and Environmental Control or their designees shall each serve as the liaison between their respective state agencies and each commission.

The commissions may obtain information and data upon request from all state officers, agents, agencies, and departments of the State of North Carolina and the State of South Carolina while in discharge of their duties.

History.

2004-83, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), (v).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), (v), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subsection (a); and substituted “Secretary of Environmental Quality” for “Secretary of Environment and Natural Resources” in subsection (b).

§ 77-115.
Funding.

Each commission shall annually adopt a budget that shall include the estimated income and expenses of each commission. Funding for the commissions shall be shared and apportioned between the State of North Carolina and the State of South Carolina as each state may provide through its regular appropriations process.

The accounts and records of each commission showing the receipt and disbursement of funds from whatever source derived shall be in the form that the Auditor of North Carolina and the State Auditor of South Carolina prescribe. The accounts and records of each commission shall be subject to an annual audit by the Auditor of North Carolina and the State Auditor of South Carolina or their legal representatives. The cost of the annual audits shall be borne by each commission. The results of the audits shall be delivered as part of the annual report required by

G.S. 77-117

by October 1 of each year to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly of North Carolina, and as provided by the State of South Carolina.

History.

2004-83, s. 1; 2017-57, s. 14.1(c); 2020-74, s. 14(c).

§ 77-116.
Compensation and expenses of members of the commissions.

Members of the commissions who are appointed from or reside in North Carolina shall receive no salary for their service on the commissions but may be paid, within available resources, per diem, subsistence, and travel expenses as follows:

Members of the commissions who are members of the General Assembly at the rate established in

G.S. 120-3.1

.

Members of the commissions who are officials or employees of the State or of local government agencies at the rate established in

G.S. 138-6

.

All other members of the commissions at the rate established in

G.S. 138-5

.

Members of the commissions who are appointed from or reside in South Carolina shall be compensated as provided by the General Assembly of South Carolina.

All expenses shall be paid from funds appropriated or otherwise available to the commissions.

History.

2004-83, s. 1.

§ 77-117.
Annual report.

The commissions shall submit annual reports, including the annual audit required by

G.S. 77-115

and any recommendations, on or before October 1 of each year to Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly of North Carolina, and as provided by the State of South Carolina.

History.

2004-83, s. 1; 2020-74, s. 14(d).

§ 77-118.
Termination.

The General Assembly of North Carolina may terminate the commissions by repealing this Article. The commissions shall terminate if the General Assembly of South Carolina repeals the provisions of the South Carolina Code of Laws that are comparable to this Article.

History.

2004-83, s. 1.

§§ 77-119 through 77-124.

Reserved for future codification purposes.